Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Oregon Military Department, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for  the following
purposes:
(1) Administration..........................  $ 14,234,224
(2) Operations.................................  $ 18,053,142
(3) Community support ..................  $ 1,532,203
(4) Capital debt service and
related costs ............................. $ 12,942,139
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and re-
imbursements from federal service  agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds
not described in this section, collected or received by the Oregon Military Department,  for
the following purposes:
(1) Administration.......................... $ 4,031,798
(2) Operations................................. $ 8,102,057
(3) Community support .................. $ 12,175,330
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from federal funds, other than those described  in section 2 of this 2025 Act,
collected or received by the Oregon Military Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $146,237,880
(2) Community support .................. $ 23,462,611
(3) Capital improvement................. $ 5,813,288
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5533 (SB 5533-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 5, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5533 (SB 5533-A) Page 2